Washington statutes.
RCW 7.88.020

Compliance review document confidentiality—Civil actions—Immunity of compliance review personnel from compulsory testimony.

Except as provided in RCW 7.88.030:

(1) Compliance review documents are confidential and are not discoverable or admissible as evidence in any civil action.

(2) Compliance review personnel shall not be required to testify at deposition or trial in any civil action concerning the contents of or matters addressed in any compliance review or any compliance review documents, nor as to the actions or activities undertaken by or at the direction of the financial institution or affiliate in connection with a compliance review.

[ 1997 c 435 s 3.]